Wisconsin, session 2025, AB574.
do enact as follows:AB574,11Section 1. 6.275 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,3,1126.275 (1) (f) The total number of postcards sent by the municipal clerk or 3board of election commissioners under s. 6.56 (3), the total number of such 4postcards returned to the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners 5because the elector did not reside at the address given on the postcard, the total 6number of electors whose status was changed from eligible to ineligible on removed 1from the registration list as a result of the audit under s. 6.56 (3), and the number of 2individuals referred to the district attorney under s. 6.56 (3). The municipal clerk 3or board of election commissioners shall provide the information described under 4this paragraph to the elections commission and the county clerk or county board of 5election commissioners at the earliest practicable time after, but no later than 90 6days after, each primary and election at which a state or national office is filled or a 7statewide referendum is held, including any special election. The municipal clerk or 8board of election commissioners shall update the information described under this 9paragraph on a monthly basis and shall submit, on a monthly basis, any such 10updated information to the elections commission and the county clerk or county 11board of election commissioners.AB574,212Section 2. 6.32 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,4,5136.32 (4) If the form is sufficient to accomplish registration and the 14commission or clerk has no reliable information to indicate that the proposed elector 15is not qualified, the commission or clerk shall enter the elector’s name on the 16registration list and transmit a 1st class letter or postcard to the registrant, 17specifying the elector’s ward or aldermanic district, or both, if any, and polling 18place. The letter or postcard shall be sent within 10 days of receipt of the form. If 19the letter or postcard is returned, or if the commission or clerk is informed of a 20different address than the one specified by the elector, the commission or clerk shall 21change the status of remove the elector on from the list from eligible to ineligible. 22The letter or postcard shall be marked in accordance with postal regulations to 23ensure that it will be returned to the commission or clerk if the elector does not 1reside at the address given on the letter or postcard. For purposes of this 2subsection, the commission or clerk shall examine information provided by the U.S. 3postal service to verify that the address listed by the proposed elector is the 4proposed elector’s current address, including a change of address form signed by the 5proposed elector.AB574,36Section 3. 6.33 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,4,1176.33 (4) When an individual’s registration is changed from eligible to 8ineligible status individual is removed from the registration list for any reason, the 9municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall enter notify the 10commission, providing the date of and reason for change on removal from the 11registration list.AB574,412Section 4. 6.33 (5) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,4,21136.33 (5) (a) 1. Except as provided in par. (b) and this paragraph, whenever a 14municipal clerk receives a valid registration or valid change of a name or address 15under an existing registration or changes a registration from eligible to ineligible 16status, the municipal clerk or the clerk’s designee shall promptly enter 17electronically on the list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) the 18information required under that subsection. For purposes of this subdivision, a 19valid change of address is a change of address form signed by the elector or proposed 20elector that is provided by the U.S. postal service and verified by the municipal 21clerk or the clerk’s designee.AB574,522Section 5. 6.36 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,5,5236.36 (1) (d) Upon receipt of official notification by the appropriate election 1administrative authority of another state, territory, or possession that an elector 2whose name appears on the list has registered to vote in that state, territory, or 3possession, the commission or the municipal clerk of the municipality where the 4elector formerly resided shall change the elector’s registration from eligible to 5ineligible status remove the elector’s name from the registration list.AB574,66Section 6. 6.36 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,5,1776.36 (1) (e) If the commission adds the name of any elector to the list, the 8commission shall promptly notify the municipal clerk of the municipality where the 9elector resides. If the commission changes the registration of any elector from 10eligible to ineligible status removes an elector from the list, the commission shall 11promptly notify the municipal clerk of the municipality where the elector resides or, 12if the elector has changed his or her residence from one municipality to another 13municipality in this state, shall promptly notify the municipal clerk of the 14municipality where the elector resided prior to the change removal. Notification 15shall be made in writing or by electronic transmission. If the commission changes 16the registration of any elector from eligible to ineligible status, the commission shall 17make an entry on the list giving the date of and the reason for the change.AB574,718Section 7. 6.47 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,6,4196.47 (6) Upon expiration of a confidential listing on a registration list under 20sub. (2), the municipal clerk shall change the registration of remove the protected 21individual to ineligible status from the registration list unless the individual files a 22new request and qualifies under sub. (2) to obtain a renewal of the listing or unless 23the individual applies for and qualifies to obtain a nonconfidential voter 1registration. Except as authorized in sub. (8), the municipal clerk shall withhold 2from public inspection under s. 19.35 (1) the name and address of any individual 3whose registration is changed removed under this subsection if the individual 4qualified for a confidential listing at the time of that listing.AB574,85Section 8. 6.47 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,6,966.47 (7) (b) If notice to a protected individual is not provided under par. (a), 7the municipal clerk shall provide notice to the subject individual upon changing a 8listed individual to ineligible status removing a listed individual from the 9registration list under sub. (6).AB574,910Section 9. 6.48 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,6,14116.48 (1) (d) If the clerk determines that the challenged elector is not qualified, 12the clerk shall change the challenged elector’s registration from eligible to ineligible 13status on remove the elector from the registration list and notify the inspectors for 14the ward or election district where the elector was registered.AB574,1015Section 10. 6.48 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,7,2166.48 (2) (b) Upon appearing in person, objectors shall be examined, under 17oath, by the commissioners and testimony taken. Judgment rests with the board of 18election commissioners and decisions shall be rendered as soon as heard. All cases 19are heard and decided summarily. The commissioners shall determine whether the 20person objected to is qualified. If they the commissioners determine that a person is 21not qualified, the executive director of the board of election commissioners shall 22change the elector from eligible to ineligible status on remove the person from the 1registration list and shall notify the proper ward officials of the change 2immediately.AB574,113Section 11. 6.50 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,7,846.50 (2) If an elector to whom a notice of suspension was mailed under sub. (1) 5has not applied for continuation of registration within 30 days of the date of 6mailing, the commission shall change the registration status of that elector from 7eligible to ineligible remove the elector from the registration list on the day that 8falls 30 days after the date of mailing.AB574,129Section 12. 6.50 (2g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,7,13106.50 (2g) The commission may delegate to a municipal clerk or board of 11election commissioners of a municipality the responsibility to change the 12registration status of remove electors from the registration list when required under 13sub. (2).AB574,1314Section 13. 6.50 (2r) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,7,17156.50 (2r) (g) The number of electors who received notices under sub. (1) and 16whose status changed from eligible to ineligible who were removed from the 17registration list.AB574,1418Section 14. 6.50 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,8,13196.50 (3) Upon receipt of reliable information that a registered elector has 20changed his or her residence to a location outside of the municipality, the municipal 21clerk or board of election commissioners shall notify the elector by mailing a notice 22by 1st class mail to the elector’s registration address stating the source of the 23information. The clerk or board of election commissioners shall examine change of 1address information provided by the U.S. postal service to determine whether the 2elector has signed and submitted a change of address form with the U.S. postal 3service. All municipal departments and agencies receiving information that a 4registered elector has changed his or her residence shall notify the clerk or board of 5election commissioners. If the elector no longer resides in the municipality or fails 6to apply for continuation of registration within 30 days of the date the notice is 7mailed, the clerk or board of election commissioners shall change the elector’s 8registration from eligible to ineligible status remove the elector from the 9registration list. Upon receipt of reliable information that a registered elector has 10changed his or her residence within the municipality, the municipal clerk or board 11of election commissioners shall change the elector’s registration and mail the 12elector a notice of the change. This subsection does not restrict the right of an 13elector to challenge any registration under s. 6.325, 6.48, 6.925, 6.93, or 7.52 (5).AB574,1514Section 15. 6.50 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,8,18156.50 (4) The municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall change 16the registration of remove deceased electors from eligible to ineligible status the 17registration list by means of checking vital statistics reports. No notice need be sent 18of registration changes removals made under this subsection.AB574,1619Section 16. 6.50 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,9,6206.50 (5) The registration of any elector whose address is listed at a building 21which that has been condemned for human habitation by the municipality under s. 2266.0413 (1) (j) shall be investigated by the municipal clerk or board of election 23commissioners. If the clerk or board of election commissioners can find no reason 1why the such an elector should remain on the registration of such an elector should 2not be changed from eligible to ineligible status list, the clerk or board of election 3commissioners shall change the elector’s registration status remove the elector from 4the list. If the elector has left a forwarding address with the U.S. postal service, a 5notice of change in status removal shall be mailed by the clerk or board of election 6commissioners to the forwarding address.AB574,177Section 17. 6.50 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB574,9,1086.50 (6) The municipal clerk, upon authorization by an elector, shall change 9the elector’s registration from eligible to ineligible status remove the elector from 10the registration list.AB574,1811Section 18. 6.50 (7) of the statutes is repealed.AB574,1912Section 19. 6.50 (8) of the statutes is renumbered 6.50 (8) (a) and amended 13to read:AB574,9,24146.50 (8) (a) Any Each municipal governing body may shall direct the 15municipal clerk or board of election commissioners to arrange with the U.S. postal 16service pursuant to applicable federal regulations, to receive change of address 17information with respect to individuals residing within the municipality for 18revision of the elector registration list. If required by the U.S. postal service, the 19governing body may create a registration commission consisting of the municipal 20clerk or executive director of the board of election commissioners and 2 other 21electors of the municipality appointed by the clerk or executive director for the 22purpose of making application for address changes and processing the information 23received. The municipal clerk or executive director shall act as chairperson of the 24commission. Any authorization under this subsection shall be for a definite period 1or until the municipal governing body otherwise determines. The procedure shall 2apply uniformly to the entire municipality whenever used. The procedure shall 3provide for receipt of complete change of address information on an automatic basis, 4or but not less often than once every 2 years during the 60 days preceding the close 5of registration for the partisan primary. If a municipality adopts the procedure for 6obtaining address corrections under this subsection, it need not comply with the 7procedure for mailing address verification cards under subs. (1) and (2).AB574,208Section 20. 6.50 (8) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB574,10,1796.50 (8) (b) 1. The commission shall create an online form to be used by an 10elector in this state to notify the appropriate municipal clerk or board of election 11commissioners of the elector’s change of address. The form shall include space for 12the elector to specify his or her first, middle, and last name and suffix, if any; email 13address; telephone number; previous address, including street, municipality, state, 14and zip code; and current address, including street, municipality, state, and zip 15code. The online form shall include an electronic method for verifying the voter's 16current address using change of address information provided by the U.S. postal 17service.AB574,10,21182. The commission shall post on its website that an address change using the 19U.S. postal service change of address form, signed by the elector, is necessary for 20notifying the appropriate municipal clerk or board of election commissioners of the 21elector’s change of address. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab574 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab574 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB574 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB574 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB574: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting